Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Highways
177.077.
Limited supplemental guide signs — Administrative regulations — Criteria for approval — Hearings — Effect on pre-existing signs.

No later than February 1, 1999, the commissioner of the Department of Highways shall establish standards, procedures, and forms for the making and approval of applications for a limited supplemental guide sign by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The criteria for the approval of a limited supplemental guide sign application for an historical site or for a tourist area or attraction shall be based upon average annual attendance and distance from a fully controlled access highway interchange.

At a fully controlled access highway interchange in a rural area, the standards for approval shall be the lesser of:

Tourist areas and attractions that have an average annual attendance of ten thousand (10,000) visitors and are located within fifty (50) miles of a fully controlled access highway;

Tourist areas and attractions that are located within fifty (50) miles of a fully controlled access interchange and have an annual visitation equal to or greater than the average annual daily traffic count of the fully controlled access highway at the interchange from which the attraction is served.

At a fully controlled access highway interchange in a city, the standards for approval shall be the lesser of:

Tourist areas and attractions that have an average annual attendance of seventy-five thousand (75,000) visitors and are located within fifty (50) miles of a fully controlled access highway interchange;

Tourist areas and attractions that are located within fifty (50) miles of a fully controlled access highway interchange and have an annual visitation equal to the average annual daily traffic count of the fully controlled access highway at the interchange from which the attraction is served.

Historical sites that are located in either a rural area or a city shall have an average annual attendance of five thousand (5,000) and shall be located within fifty (50) miles from a fully controlled access highway interchange.

The identification of a tourist area or attraction on a specific service sign pursuant to KRS

177.0736

shall not affect its eligibility for a limited supplemental guide sign.

Upon receipt of an application, the commissioner of the Department of Highways shall within thirty (30) days provide written notification to the applicant of any hearings pertaining to the application. The commissioner of the Department of Highways shall make a determination on whether to approve the erection of a limited supplemental guide sign within ninety (90) days after the receipt of an application and shall provide written notification to the applicant of his decision.

Supplemental guide signs, including but not limited to limited supplemental guide signs, erected prior to July 1, 1998, shall not be removed due to the site selection criteria contained in KRS

177.076

to

177.079

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 526, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 353, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). Section 2 of 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 353 (House Bill 693) made no changes to this statute. The changes to KRS

177.077

contained in the General Assembly version of House Bill 693 were eliminated by Senate Committee Amendment 1, which was adopted by the Senate and concurred in by the House of Representatives. This left the existing text of KRS

177.077

unchanged.

177.078.
Application — Fees — Reimbursement.

An application from an historical site or from a tourist area or attraction for the erection of a limited supplemental guide sign shall be made to the commissioner of the Department of Highways. The application shall include, but not be limited to:

Evidence that demonstrates the average annual attendance;

Evidence that the tourist area or attraction is established as a permanent business; and

Evidence that the tourist area or attraction has all necessary and proper licenses, that normal business hours shall be maintained, that it is open to the traveling public, and that it provides recreational or educational opportunities.

An application fee of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be paid to the Department of Highways by each applicant.

Upon approval of the application, the applicant shall reimburse the Transportation Cabinet for the total cost of the sign and its installation. The applicant shall have the option to pay the reimbursement cost in full or amortize the reimbursement cost for a period not to exceed ten (10) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 526, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 353, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

177.079.
Commissioner required to apply to Federal Highway Administration for experimental usage of signs.

Pursuant to the requirements of the MUTCD Section 1A-6, the commissioner of the Department of Highways shall apply to the Federal Highway Administration, by no later than February 1, 1999, for permission to experiment with a new usage of post-interchange guide signs on all fully controlled access highways in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 526, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

177.080.
Condemnation for right-of-way. [Repealed.]

177.081.
Authority of Department of Highways to condemn land and materials — Title to property — Conclusiveness of official order — Duty of department to clear and maintain property.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, when it has, by official order, designated the route, location, or relocation of a highway, limited access highway, bridge, roadside park, borrow-pit, quarry, garage, or other property or structure deemed necessary for the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of an adequate system of highways, may, if unable to contract or agree with the owner or owners thereof, condemn the lands or material, or the use and occupancy of the lands designated as necessary. All property acquired by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, shall be in fee simple whenever so specified in the petition filed in the action. The official order of the Department of Highways shall be conclusive of the public use of the condemned property and the condemnor’s decision as to the necessity for taking the property will not be disturbed in the absence of fraud, bad faith, or abuse of discretion.

Any property purchased or otherwise acquired by the Department of Highways for the purpose of construction or reconstruction of a road, street, or highway shall be cleared and maintained by the Department of Highways from the time of acquisition until such property is no longer owned by the department.

The proceedings for condemnation shall be as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 49, §§ 1, 10; effective June 19, 1952; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 140, § 74; 1980, ch. 231, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

177.082.
County attorney to represent Department of Highways in condemnation proceedings — Petition.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, when seeking to condemn lands and material and the use and occupancy of lands, under the provisions of KRS

177.081

, shall direct the county attorney or any attorney authorized to represent the Commonwealth to file a petition in the office of the Circuit Court clerk in the county in which all or the greater portion of the land or material is located. If any authorized attorney, other than the county attorney, is directed to file the petition, the county attorney shall assist in the prosecution of the action. The petition shall be filed in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, and may join as plaintiff the county in which any part of the property is situated, or in which the petition is filed, or any municipality thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 49, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 140, § 75; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 166, effective January 2, 1978.

177.083.
Commissioners, appointment, oath, duties, fees. [Repealed.]

177.084.
Summons, issuance, contents — Report of warning order attorney. [Repealed.]

177.085.
Answer, filing, allegations. [Repealed.]

177.086.
Action by county court on commissioners’ report if no answer filed — Judgment — Hearing by court if answer filed. — Judgment. [Repealed.]

177.087.
Time for filing and proceedings upon appeals to the circuit court and Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

177.088.
Payment of compensation into court. [Repealed.]

177.089.
Proceedings against conflicting claimants. [Repealed.]

177.090.
Acquisition of land along federal-aid highways for scenic beauty — Condemnation.

The Department of Highways is hereby authorized to acquire and improve strips of land necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty within and adjacent to federal-aid highways of this state, including acquisition and development of publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas and sanitary and other facilities within or adjacent to the highway right-of-way reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public.

The interest in any land authorized to be acquired and maintained under this section may be the fee simple or any lesser interest, as determined by the Department of Highways to be reasonably necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. Such acquisition may be by gift, purchase, exchange, or condemnation.

The acquisition through condemnation shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 104, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 140, § 76.

177.100.
Condemnation procedure. [Repealed.]

177.103.
Definitions for KRS 177.106. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 202, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 148, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

177.106.
Definition — Highway encroachment prohibited without permit — Removal — Civil fines imposed and collected — Permissible use of fines.

As used in this section, “encroachment” means any improvement to land including but not limited to buildings, fences, ditches, embankments, driveways, or signs, or any change from the original contour of land, that:

Is constructed, created, or implemented under, on, or over the right-of-way of a state-maintained road; and

May hinder or prevent use or maintenance of a road or right-of-way.

A person shall not cause an encroachment or allow an encroachment to remain under, on, or over any part of the right-of-way of a state-maintained road unless that person has first obtained an encroachment permit from the Department of Highways.

If the department determines that an encroachment, for which an encroachment permit has not been issued, interferes with the safe, convenient, and continuous use and maintenance of a road, the department shall issue to the responsible party a notice of violation and order to remove or relocate the encroachment within seven (7) days, at the responsible party’s expense.

If the department orders the removal or change in location of any encroachment from the right-of-way and the responsible party fails to remove it or change its location within the time allotted in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department shall:

Cause the removal of the encroachment; and

Recoup the cost of removal from the responsible party. Moneys recouped under this paragraph shall be deposited in the road fund.

In addition to any payment required to cover the costs of removal pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section, any person who fails to obtain a permit as required by subsection (2)(a) of this section shall, upon issuance of a notice of violation under subsection (2)(b) of this section:

Be subject to a civil fine of:

Five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation;

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second violation within a three (3) year period; and

Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a third or subsequent violation within a three (3) year period;

After a third violation within a three (3) year period, be prohibited from receiving an encroachment permit from the department for a period of six (6) months, from the date of notice of the third violation; and

Be responsible for payment, within twenty-four (24) hours of notice from the department, for any safety measures determined to be necessary by the department.

Any civil fines imposed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be:

Collected by the municipality in which the violation occurred; and

Used by that municipality for public safety or infrastructure purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 202, § 2; 2021 ch. 148, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.